District of Columbia statutes.
7-1304.12

Payment of costs and expenses.

Costs and expenses of all proceedings held under this chapter shall be paid as follows:

(1)

To expert witnesses designated by the Court, an amount determined by the Court;

(2)

To attorneys appointed under this chapter, fees as authorized under the Criminal Justice Act (§ 11-2601 et seq.);

(3)

To other witnesses, the same fees and mileage as for attendance at Court to be paid upon the approval of the Court.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-137, § 412, 25 DCR 5094

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-1952.
1973 Ed., § 6-1679.